Washington statutes.
RCW 43.58.070

Oregon-Washington Columbia River boundary compact—Transfer of records, etc., to division of archives.

Upon ratification by the state of Oregon and approval by the Congress of the United States of the compact set forth in RCW 43.58.060, the secretary of the Washington-Oregon boundary commission is hereby directed to transmit all records, work sheets, maps, minutes and other papers of said commission to the division of archives and records management of the office of the secretary of state.

[ 1981 c 115 s 3; 1965 c 8 s 43.58.070. Prior: 1957 c 90 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—1981 c 115: See note following RCW 40.14.020.